src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V0_VUEʹHSSED !!= * @CODE@ vueʹhssed:vuâhss

!! 1.e.
!! 1c
!! * Yaml: __V-juekked__
! FORMS
!! XYY-HighVowel-Palatalization
:%^PALE%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (1) +V+Inf: vueʹhssed
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

!! XYY-HighVowel-No-palatalization
: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuâhss
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

!! XYY-HighVowel-Palatalization
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^PALE%^PAL%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vueʹhsse
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3
+Use/NG+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^PALÄ%^PAL%>e K ; !3

!! XYY-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vuõʹlǧǧe
!! +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

!! 2XY-StableV-Palatalization
:%^PALE%^PAL%^XYY2VY VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) +V+Imprt+Sg2: vueuʹs
!! Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr

!! 2XY-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^XYY2VY%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: !! vuõuʹsež
+Use/NG:%^PALE%^PAL%^XYY2VY%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; 
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot, 

!! 2XY-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:%^XYY2VY%> VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: vuâusas
!! Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

!! XYY-RaisedVowel-No-palatalization
:%^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: vuõhssu
!! Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

!! XYY-HighVowel-No-palatalization
: VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: vuâhssaz
!! Imprt+Pl3

!! (10) Allegro for incoative: vueuʹs»
+Der/škueʹtted:%^PALE%^PAL%^XYY2VY»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;

!! !CLASS 1 LOW VOWEL, PALATALIZATION
!! EVEN-SYLLABLE STEMS IN -ED

LEXICON V_SOLLÂʹTTED !!= * @CODE@ sollâʹtted:sollâtt
+V: V0_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
LEXICON IV_SOLLÂʹTTED !!= * @CODE@ sollâʹtted:sollâtt
+V+IV: V0_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
LEXICON TV_SOLLÂʹTTED !!= * @CODE@ sollâʹtted:sollâtt
+V+TV: V0_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
LEXICON V0_SOLLÂʹTTED !!= * @CODE@ sollâʹtted:sollâtt

! seek parallel in TÄTTAD
! FORMS
!! ExtraStrong-LowVowel-Palatalization
:%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (1) +V+Inf: sollâʹtted
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LowVowel-No-palatalization
: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sollâtt
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

!! Strong-LowVowel-Palatalization
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^PAL%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: sollâʹtte
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: joʹtte
!! +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

!! Strong-StableV-Palatalization
:%^V2VV%^PAL VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) +V+Imprt+Sg2: sollââʹtt
!! Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr

!! Strong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:%^V2VV%^VOWRaise%^PAL VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: sollõõʹttež
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,

!! Strong-LowVowel-No-palatalization
:%^V2VV VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: sollââttas
!! Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

:%^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: sollõttu
!! Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LowVowel-No-palatalization
: VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: sollâttaz
!! Imprt+Pl3

!! (10) Allegro for incoative: sollâʹđ»
+Der/škueʹtted:%^PAL%^CC2C%>e»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ; 



LEXICON V_JÅÅʹTTED !!= * @CODE@ jååʹtted:jåått
+V: V0_JÅÅʹTTED ;
LEXICON IV_JÅÅʹTTED !!= * @CODE@ jååʹtted:jåått
+V+IV: V0_JÅÅʹTTED ;
LEXICON TV_JÅÅʹTTED !!= * @CODE@ jååʹtted:jåått
+V+TV: V0_JÅÅʹTTED ;
LEXICON V0_JÅÅʹTTED !!= * @CODE@ jååʹtted:jåått

! FORMS
!! Strong-LowVowel-Palatalization
:%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (1) +V+Inf: jååʹtted
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

!! Strong-LowVowel-No-palatalization
: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jåått
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LowVowel-Palatalization
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VV2V%^PAL%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: jåʹtte
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:%^VV2V%^VOWRaise%^PAL%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: joʹtte
!! +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

!! Weak-StableV-Palatalization
:%^PAL%^CC2C VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (5)
!! Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr

!! Weak-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^CC2C VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: jooʹđež
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,

!! Weak-LowVowel-No-palatalization
:%^CC2C VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: jååđas
!! Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-No-palatalization
:%^VV2V%^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: jottu
!! Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:%^VV2V VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: jåttaz
!! Imprt+Pl3

! (10) Allegro for incoative: jåʹđ»
+Der/škueʹtted:%^VV2V%^PAL%^CC2C»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;

LEXICON V_ǨEʹTTED !!= * @CODE@ ǩeʹtted:ǩeâtt
+V: V0_ǨEʹTTED ;
LEXICON IV_ǨEʹTTED !!= * @CODE@ ǩeʹtted:ǩeâtt
+V+IV: V0_ǨEʹTTED ;
LEXICON TV_ǨEʹTTED !!= * @CODE@ ǩeʹtted:ǩeâtt
+V+TV: V0_ǨEʹTTED ;
LEXICON V0_ǨEʹTTED !!= * @CODE@ ǩeʹtted:ǩeâtt

! seek parallel in TÄTTAD
! FORMS
!! ExtraStrong-LowVowel-Palatalization
:%^VV2V%^PALE%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (1) +V+Inf: ǩeʹtted
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LowVowel-No-palatalization
: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ǩeâtt
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

!! Strong-LowVowel-Palatalization
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VV2V%^PALE%^PAL%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ǩeʹtte
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization CHECKME = 2015-10-11
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: joʹtte
!! +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

!! Strong-StableV-Palatalization
:%^V2VV%^PALE%^PAL VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) +V+Imprt+Sg2: sollââʹtt
!! Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr

!! Strong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:%^V2VV%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: sollõõʹttež
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,

!! Strong-LowVowel-No-palatalization
:%^V2VV VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: sollââttas
!! Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

:%^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: sollõttu
!! Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LowVowel-No-palatalization
: VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: sollâttaz
!! Imprt+Pl3

!! (10) Allegro for incoative: sollâʹđ»
+Der/škueʹtted:%^VV2V%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2C%>e»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ; 

LEXICON V_KÅÅʹCCED !!= * @CODE@ kååʹcced:kååcc
+V: V0_KÅÅʹCCED ;
LEXICON IV_KÅÅʹCCED !!= * @CODE@ kååʹcced:kååcc
+V+IV: V0_KÅÅʹCCED ;
LEXICON TV_KÅÅʹCCED !!= * @CODE@ kååʹcced:kååcc
+V+TV: V0_KÅÅʹCCED ;
