src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
ainsmâʹtted:ainsmâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
aukstâʹtted:aukstâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
ceʹcced:cecc V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
ciâggtâʹtted:ciâggtâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
eeʹtted:eett V_JÅÅʹTTED ;
ellstâʹtted:ellstâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
fäʹtted:fätt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
gåårâʹtted:gåårâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
heättʼtâʹtted:heättʼtâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
hirmstâʹtted:hirmstâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
hoorâʹtted:hoorâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
hääʹsǩâʹtted:hääʹsǩâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
jeäʹttʼtâʹtted:jeäʹttʼtâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
jiõnntâʹtted:jiõnntâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
jokklâʹtted:jokklâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
joorrlâʹtted:joorrlâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
jorbbsmâʹtted:jorbbsmâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
juäʹrmmjâʹtted:juäʹrmmjâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
juäʹrmmâʹtted:juäʹrmmâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
juõllâʹtted:juõllâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
juǥstâʹtted:juǥstâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
jättâʹtted:jättâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
jäävtâʹtted:jäävtâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
jääʹmmed:jäämm V_JÅÅʹTTED ;
jåårǥlâʹtted:jåårǥlâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
jååʹtted:jåått V_JÅÅʹTTED ;
jåʹttlâʹtted:jåʹttlâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
jõõrhâʹtted:jõõrhâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
jõõrâʹtted:jõõrâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
kalšmâʹtted:kalšmâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
kirrlâʹtted:kirrlâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
koolčtâʹtted:koolčtâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
kruugstâʹtted:kruugstâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
kueʹlšeeʹlled:kueʹlšeell V_JÅÅʹTTED ;
kuårâʹtted:kuårâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
kuõskklâʹtted:kuõskklâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
kuõsslâʹtted:kuõsslâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
kuõzzlâʹtted:kuõzzlâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
kuʹccrâʹtted:kuʹccrâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
kuʹmmlâʹtted:kuʹmmlâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
kâʹcced:kâcc V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
käʹrŋŋlâʹtted:käʹrŋŋlâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
käʹtted:kätt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
kååʹcced:kååcc V_KÅÅʹCCED ;
kååʹđđed:kååđđ V_JÅÅʹTTED ;
kåʹssed:kåss V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
kõrrsmâʹtted:kõrrsmâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
levvrâʹtted:levvrâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
leävhâʹtted:leävhâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
leäʹđghâʹtted:leäʹđghâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
likstâʹtted:likstâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
liuggsâʹtted:liuggsâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
läähhlâʹtted:läähhlâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
lääʹlled:lääll V_JÅÅʹTTED ;
läʹpped:läpp V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
mainstâʹtted:mainstâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
mäŋgstâʹtted:mäŋgstâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
mäʹcced:mäcc V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
mäʹtted:mätt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
njaalǥhâʹtted:njaalǥhâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
njeʹǩǩlâʹtted:njeʹǩǩlâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
njuõrsmâʹtted:njuõrsmâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
njââlhâʹtted:njââlhâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
njââllhâʹtted:njââllhâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
njââʹđđed:njââđđ V_JÅÅʹTTED ;
njäʹlǥsmâʹtted:njäʹlǥsmâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
nuõrrsmâʹtted:nuõrrsmâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
nânsmâʹtted:nânsmâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
nääʹltâʹtted:nääʹltâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
nåidsmâʹtted:nåidsmâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
okknâʹtted:okknâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
orgsmâʹtted:orgsmâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
ođđsmâʹtted:ođđsmâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
paaǯǯâʹtted:paaǯǯâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
peelhâʹtted:peelhâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
peivvâʹtted:peivvâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
pelčstâʹtted:pelčstâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
peʹcclâʹtted:peʹcclâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
pirstâʹtted:pirstâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
piõulldâʹtted:piõulldâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
polstjâʹtted:polstjâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
polsttjâʹtted:polsttjâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
ponnjlâʹtted:ponnjlâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
poppâʹtted:poppâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
proʹsttjâʹtted:proʹsttjâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
puåttrâʹtted:puåttrâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
puõʹllʼjâʹtted:puõʹllʼjâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
pâstlmâʹtted:pâstlmâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
pââʹnned:pâânn V_JÅÅʹTTED ;
påårǥhâʹtted:påårǥhâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
påǥstâʹtted:påǥstâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
põõʹlâʹtted:põõʹlâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
registâʹtted:registâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
reämhâʹtted:reämhâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
reʹsslâʹtted:reʹsslâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
rovvâʹtted:rovvâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
rämmâʹtted:rämmâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
rääʒʒhâʹtted:rääʒʒhâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
siõblâʹtted:siõblâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
sojjlâʹtted:sojjlâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
steärhâʹtted:steärhâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
suõʹppâʹtted:suõʹppâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
säʹtted:sätt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
tieʹrrstâʹtted:tieʹrrstâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
tuâitâʹtted:tuâitâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
tuårǥsmâʹtted:tuårǥsmâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
täällâʹtted:täällâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
tõrǥsmâʹtted:tõrǥsmâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
virrlâʹtted:virrlâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
viõrrlâʹtted:viõrrlâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
vueʹrbbâʹtted:vueʹrbbâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
vuäivvâʹtted:vuäivvâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
vuõddstâʹtted:vuõddstâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
väʹʒʒlâʹtted:väʹʒʒlâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
võõnnlâʹtted:võõnnlâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
ââʹnned:âânn V_JÅÅʹTTED ;
älšmâʹtted:älšmâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
čaʹjjâʹtted:čaʹjjâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
čiŋŋlâʹtted:čiŋŋlâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
čorstâʹtted:čorstâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
čääppâʹtted:čääppâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
čääʹlled:čääll V_JÅÅʹTTED ;
šeeʹlled:šeell V_JÅÅʹTTED ;
šeämâʹtted:šeämâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
špeigghâʹtted:špeigghâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
šäärhâʹtted:šäärhâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
ǩeâllsâʹtted:ǩeâllsâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
ǩeäʹččrâʹtted:ǩeäʹččrâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
ǩeʹtted:ǩett V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
ǩiõbrnʼjâʹtted:ǩiõbrnʼjâtt V_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
